Vermont, session 2025-2026, H218.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. APPROPRIATIONS; OPIOID ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND
(a) In fiscal year 2026, the following sums shall be appropriated from the
Opioid Abatement Special Fund established in 18 V.S.A. § 4774:
(1)(A) $1,976,000.00 to the Department of Health to fund 26 outreach
or case management staff positions within the preferred provider network for
the provision of services that increase motivation of and engagement with
individuals with substance use disorder in settings such as police barracks,
shelters, social service organizations, and elsewhere in the community.
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that these positions shall
be funded annually by the Opioid Abatement Special Fund unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(2) $76,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Vermonters for Criminal Justice Reform to fund an outreach worker position.
(3)(A) $1,400,000.00 to the Department of Health for recovery
residences certified by the Vermont Alliance for Recovery Residences.
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that recovery residences
be funded annually at not less than fiscal year 2026 levels, unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(4)(A) $850,000.00 to the Department of Health for syringe services.
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 2 of 11
2025
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly that syringe services be
funded annually at not less than fiscal year 2026 levels, unless and until the
Special Fund does not have sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(5)(A) $1,100,000.00 to the Department of Health for the purpose of
awarding grants to the City of Burlington for establishing an overdose
prevention center upon submission of a grant proposal that has been approved
by the Burlington City Council and meets the requirements of 18 V.S.A.
§ 4256, including the guidelines developed by the Department of Health.
(B) It is the intent of the General Assembly to continue to appropriate
funds from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund through fiscal year 2028 for
the purpose of awarding grants to the City of Burlington for the operation of
the overdose prevention center, unless and until the Special Fund does not have
sufficient monies to fund this expenditure.
(6) $800,000.00 for distribution as follows:
(A) not more than $35,000.00 to the Department of Corrections for
distribution to Pathways Vermont to implement a contingency management
pilot program in Chittenden County for individuals under the supervision of
the Department of Corrections; and
(B) the remainder to the Department of Health for grants to providers
for ongoing support for contingency management.
(7) $32,157.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to the
Brattleboro Fire Department to establish community training programs on the
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 3 of 11
2025
administration of opioid antagonists, CPR, first aid, and Stop the Bleed
protocols.
(8) $44,229.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to the
Champlain Housing Trust to continue a pilot program providing access to
wound care and preventative health care in three low-barrier shelters within
Chittenden County.
(9) $800,000.00 to the Department for Children and Families’ Office of
Economic Opportunity to support long-term programs at shelters for
individuals experiencing homelessness, including harm-reduction supports and
clinical nursing programs.
(10) $309,000.00 to the Department of Health for Health Care and
Rehabilitation Services of Southeastern Vermont’s Project Connectionworks to
reduce opioid use disorder morbidity and mortality in Windham County
through prevention, treatment, and recovery services.
(11) $50,000.00 to the Judicial Branch to train Vermont’s judges on
issues related to opioid use disorder and strategies for use in dockets statewide.
(12) $200,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to Elevate
Youth Services to establish Healthy Youth Program counselors at the
Basement Teen Center at Kellogg-Hubbard Library in Washington County.
(13) $100,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to Friends
for Change’s Youth Center in Bellows Falls for the purpose of delivering
intervention strategies and harm reduction supports to youth and young adults.
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 4 of 11
2025
(14) $170,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Spectrum Youth and Family Services for two new positions to expand opioid
use disorder screening, treatment, and case management services to youth in
Chittenden and Franklin Counties.
(15) $80,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to Prevent
Child Abuse Vermont for the purpose of teaching parenting skills and
providing social and emotional parenting supports for individuals with opioid
use disorder.
(16) $850,000.00 to the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and
Independent Living for distribution to HireAbility Vermont to provide
specialized employment services for individuals with opioid use disorder in
Burlington, Newport, Rutland, and Bennington.
(17) $550,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Northeast Kingdom Community Action to hire four peer support specialists to
assist individuals with opioid use disorder who are transitioning out of
homelessness into safe, permanent housing.
(18) $150,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Connecticut Valley Addiction Services, Inc. to expand opioid use treatment in
rural Windsor County.
(19) $300,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Vermonters for Criminal Justice Reform and the Johnson Health Center to
continue and improve the Managed Medical Response Partnership.
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 5 of 11
2025
(20) $30,000.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Treatment Associates of Washington County Mental Health to hire an
embedded recovery coach.
(21) $20,824.00 to the Department of Health for distribution to
Umbrella to provide integrated services between domestic and sexual violence
providers and partners in recovery in northeastern Vermont.
(b) All grant agreements associated with funds appropriated pursuant to
this section shall require outcome and measurements data to be collected and
reported to the department issuing the grant and to the Opioid Settlement
Advisory Committee.
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. chapter 93 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 93. OPIOID USE DISORDER
Subchapter 1. Treatment of Opioid Use Disorder
* * *
§ 4754. LIMITATION ON PRIOR AUTHORIZATION REQUIREMENTS
(a) A health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for
prescription drugs for a patient who is receiving medication-assisted treatment
medication for opioid use disorder if the dosage prescribed is within the U.S.
Food and Drug Administration’s dosing recommendations.
(b) A health insurance plan shall not require prior authorization for all
counseling and behavioral therapies associated with medication-assisted
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 6 of 11
2025
treatment medication for opioid use disorder for a patient who is receiving
medication-assisted treatment.
Subchapter 2. Opioid Settlement
* * *
§ 4772. OPIOID SETTLEMENT ADVISORY COMMITTEE
* * *
(b) Membership.
(1) The Advisory Committee shall be composed of the following
members and shall reflect the diversity of Vermont in terms of gender, race,
age, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, and
socioeconomic status and ensure inclusion of individuals with lived experience
of opioid use disorder and their family members whenever possible:
* * *
(E) a primary care prescriber with experience providing medication-
assisted treatment medication for opioid use disorder within the Blueprint for
Health hub and spoke model, appointed by the Executive Director of the
Blueprint for Health, to provide a statewide perspective on the provision of
providing medication-assisted treatment medication for opioid use disorder
services;
* * *
(c) Powers and duties. The Advisory Committee shall demonstrate broad
ongoing consultation with individuals living with opioid use disorder about
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 7 of 11
2025
their direct experience with related systems, including medication-assisted
treatment medication for opioid use disorder, residential treatment, recovery
services, harm reduction services, overdose, supervision by the Department of
Corrections, and involvement with the Department for Children and Families’
Family Services Division. To that end, the Advisory Committee shall
demonstrate consultation with individuals with direct lived experience of
opioid use disorder, frontline support professionals, the Substance Misuse
Oversight Prevention and Advisory Council, and other stakeholders to identify
spending priorities as related to opioid use disorder prevention, intervention,
treatment, and recovery services and harm reduction strategies for the purpose
of providing recommendations to the Governor, the Department of Health, and
the General Assembly on prioritizing spending from the Opioid Abatement
Special Fund. The Advisory Committee shall consider:
(1) the impact of the opioid crisis on communities throughout Vermont,
including communities’ abatement needs and proposals for abatement
strategies and responses;
(2) the perspectives of and proposals from opioid use disorder
prevention coalitions, recovery centers, and medication-assisted treatment
medication for opioid use disorder providers; and
(3) the ongoing challenges of the opioid crisis on marginalized
populations, including individuals who have a lived experience of opioid use
disorder.
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 8 of 11
2025
* * *
(e) Presentation. Annually, the Advisory Committee shall vote on its
recommendations. Recommendations shall be informed by outcomes and
measurements reported by previous grantees. If the recommendations are
supported by an affirmative vote of the majority, the Advisory Committee shall
present its recommendations for expenditures from the Opioid Abatement
Special Fund established pursuant to this subchapter to the Department of
Health and concurrently submit its recommendations in writing to the House
Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare. The Advisory
Committee’s written recommendations shall address how each
recommendation meets one or more of the criteria listed in subsections 4774(b)
and (c) of this subchapter. The Advisory Committee shall give priority
consideration to services requiring funding on an ongoing basis.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Commissioner of Health shall call the first meeting of the
Advisory Committee to occur on or before June 30, 2022.
(2) Annually, the Advisory Committee shall elect a voting vice chair
from among its nongovernmental members.
(3) The Advisory Committee shall meet at least quarterly but not more
than 12 times per calendar year.
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 9 of 11
2025
(3)(4) The Advisory Committee shall adopt procedures to govern its
proceedings and organization, including voting procedures and how the
staggered terms shall be apportioned among members.
(4)(5) All meetings of the Advisory Committee shall be consistent with
Vermont’s Open Meeting Law pursuant to 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 2.
* * *
§ 4774. OPIOID ABATEMENT SPECIAL FUND
* * *
(c) Priority for expenditures from the Opioid Abatement Special Fund shall
be aimed at reducing overdose deaths, including the following:
* * *
(2) increasing access to medication-assisted treatment medication for
opioid use disorder and other opioid-related treatment, specifically:
(A) increasing distribution of medication-assisted treatment
medication for opioid use disorder to individuals who are uninsured or whose
health insurance does not cover the needed goods and services;
(B) providing education to school-based and youth-focused programs
that discourage or prevent misuse, including how to access opioid use disorder
treatment;
(C) providing medication-assisted education and awareness training
on medication for opioid use disorder to health care providers, emergency
medical technicians, law enforcement, and other first responders; and
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 10 of 11
2025
* * *
(3) assisting pregnant and postpartum individuals, specifically:
(A) enhancing services for expanding screening, brief intervention,
and referral to treatment (SBIRT) services to non-Medicaid eligible or
uninsured pregnant individuals;
(B) expanding comprehensive evidence-based or evidence-informed
treatment and recovery services, including medication-assisted treatment
medication for opioid use disorder, for individuals with co-occurring opioid
use disorder and other substance or mental health disorders for up to 12 months
postpartum; and
* * *
(5) expanding the availability of warm handoff programs and recovery
services, specifically:
(A) expanding services such as navigators and on-call teams to begin
medication-assisted treatment medication for opioid use disorder in hospital
emergency departments;
* * *
(6) treating incarcerated populations, specifically:
(A) providing evidence-based or evidence-informed treatment and
recovery support, including medication-assisted treatment medication for
opioid use disorder for individuals with opioid use disorder or co-occurring
VT LEG #383689 v.1

No. 16 Page 11 of 11
2025
substance use or mental health disorders while transitioning out of the criminal
justice system; and
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: May 13, 2025
VT LEG #383689 v.1